Florida, session 2026, HB1271.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 395.3011, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
395.3011 Billing and collection activities.—
(1)(a) As used in this section, the term "extraordinary
collection action" means any of the following actions taken by a
licensed facility against an individual in relation to obtaining
payment of a bill for care:
1.(a) Selling the individual's debt to another party,
except if, before the sale, the medical creditor has entered
into a legally binding written agreement with the medical debt
buyer which includes all of the following criteria:
a. The medical debt buyer or collector is prohibited from
engaging in any prohibited collection actions listed in
paragraph (b) to obtain payment for the care.
b. The medical debt buyer is prohibited from charging
interest on the debt in excess of that described in paragraph
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1271-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1271 2026
(2)(e).
c. The debt is returnable to or recallable by the medical
creditor upon a determination by the medical creditor or medical
debt buyer that the individual is eligible for financial
assistance.
d. If the individual is determined to be eligible for
financial assistance and the debt is not returned to or recalled
by the medical creditor, the medical debt buyer is required to
adhere to procedures which shall be specified in the agreement
that ensure that the individual does not pay, and has no
obligation to pay, the medical debt buyer and the medical
creditor together more than he or she is personally responsible
for paying in compliance with this section;
2. Filing a debt collection lawsuit; or
3. Any prohibited collection actions.
(b) As used in this subsection, the term "prohibited
collection actions" means the following activities when used by
any medical creditor or medical debt collector to collect debts
owed for health care services:
1. Causing or threatening an individual's arrest;
2. Causing or threatening an individual to be subject to a
writ of body attachment;
3. Obtaining or threatening to obtain a lien on an
individual's real property;
4. Foreclosing or threatening to foreclose on an
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1271-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1271 2026
individual's real property;
5. Garnishing or threatening to garnish wages or state
income tax refunds;
6. State or federal tax offsets to seize tax refunds or
tax credits;
7. Attaching, seizing, or threatening to attach or seize a
consumer's bank account; or
8. Furnishing or threatening to furnish information about
the medical debt to a consumer reporting agency.
(b) Reporting adverse information about the individual to
consumer credit reporting agencies or credit bureaus.
(c) Deferring, denying, or requiring a payment before
providing medically necessary care because of the individual's
nonpayment of one or more bills for previously provided care
covered under the facility's financial assistance policy.
(d) Actions that require a legal or judicial process,
including, but not limited to:
1. Placing a lien on the individual's property;
2. Foreclosing on the individual's real property;
3. Attaching or seizing the individual's bank account or
any other personal property;
4. Commencing a civil action against the individual;
5. Causing the individual's arrest; or
6. Garnishing the individual's wages.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1271-00